Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.785

Delivery or installation of detection device by fire protection service agency—Liability for civil damages.

(1) Any fire protection service agency, as defined in RCW 52.12.160, as well as the firefighters therein, whether volunteer or paid, that delivers to, or installs at, residential premises a device or batteries for such a device is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the delivery or installation of a device or batteries for such a device, provided:

(a) Such installation was done in conformance with the manufacturer's instructions;

(b) Such installation or delivery was in the fire protection service agency's official capacity; and

(c) The act or omission did not constitute gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

(2) Any device delivered or installed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be new and meet all applicable current safety and manufacturing standards.

(3) Smoke alarm installation program records considered a public record by chapter 40.14 RCW shall be retained in accordance with the schedule provided within that law.

(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or otherwise affect the obligations and duties of the owner or occupier of the residential premises receiving such delivery or installation services.

(5) For purposes of this section, "device" includes any battery-operated or plug-in smoke detector, carbon monoxide detector, or combination smoke and carbon monoxide detector.

[ 2020 c 149 s 1.]